Mississippi statutes. Title 1. Laws and Statutes
Chapter 5. Session Laws and Journals

§ 1-5-1.
Printing of general, local and private laws.

The Office of the Secretary of State shall provide for and may enter into contracts for the complete, accurate and timely printing of the general laws and the local and private laws passed at each session of the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 19, art. 5(3); 1857, ch. 6, art. 13; 1871, § 119; 1880, § 205; 1892, § 4087; Laws, 1906, § 4639; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7477; Laws, 1930, § 6937; Laws, 1942, § 4197; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 15; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-5-3.
Disposition of general, local and private laws and journals of legislature; responsibility.

The Office of the Secretary of State shall be responsible for the disposition of the general laws, local and private laws and journals of the Legislature as provided for by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4088; 1906, § 4640; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7478; 1930, § 6938; 1942, § 4198; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 430, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 16; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-5-5.
General laws and journals, local and private laws deposited in state law library.

The Office of the Secretary of State shall provide five (5) volumes of the general laws and journals and five (5) volumes of the local and private laws of each session of the Legislature to the State Law Library.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art. 17; 1871, § 122; 1880, § 208; 1892, § 4089; 1906, § 4641; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7479; 1930, § 6939; 1942, § 4199; Laws, 1989, ch. 321, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 430, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 1-5-7.
Distribution of general laws and journals, and local and private laws free of charge.

The Office of the Secretary of State shall distribute and transmit, free of cost, the general laws and journals of each session of the Legislature, as follows: One (1) volume of each to the following: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State Auditor, State Treasurer, Clerk of the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals; Mississippi State University, Mississippi University for Women, Alcorn State University, University of Southern Mississippi, Delta State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi Valley State University, University of Mississippi and University of Mississippi School of Law; the sheriff of each county for the county law library; each member of the Legislature; the Secretary of the Senate; the Clerk of the House; each attorney employed in the Legislative Services Offices of the House of Representatives and the Senate; each legislative committee meeting room in the New Capitol; the Legislative Reference Bureau; the Legislative Budget Office; the Department of Archives and History; and the Library of Congress at Washington, D.C. The copies to be provided each sheriff, member of the Legislature and each attorney employed in the Legislative Services Offices of the House and Senate shall not be provided unless specifically requested by such sheriff, legislator or attorney in writing. The Office of the Secretary of State shall provide, free of cost, one (1) volume of the local and private laws to each attorney employed in the Legislative Services Offices of the House of Representatives and the Senate; each legislative committee meeting room in the New Capitol; and the Legislative Reference Bureau; however, the copies to be provided each attorney employed in the Legislative Services Offices of the House and Senate shall not be provided unless specifically requested by such attorney in writing.

In addition to the volumes provided to the Legislative Services Offices’ attorneys under this section, four (4) volumes of the general laws, three (3) volumes of the local and private laws and two (2) volumes of the journal of the particular house involved shall be provided free of cost to the Legislative Services Offices of the House of Representatives and the Senate. Receipt of any number of volumes that are to be provided to the Legislative Services Offices and their attorneys under this section may be waived in writing by the Director of the Legislative Services Office of either house.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 19, art. 5 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art. 18; 1871, § 123; 1880, § 209; 1892, § 4090; 1906, § 4642; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7480; 1930, § 6940; 1942, § 4200; Laws, 1938, ch. 215; Laws, 1940, ch. 317; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 430, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 9; Laws, 2004, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 376, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 390, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 1-5-9.
Distribution of general laws of Legislature to judges of United States.

The Secretary of State shall, in the same manner, further distribute one (1) copy of the general laws of the Legislature alone to each of the judges of the United States courts in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 19, art. 5 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art. 18; 1871, § 123; 1880, § 209; 1892, § 4091; 1906, § 4643; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7481; 1930, § 6941; 1942, § 4201; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 21; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 1-5-11.
Publication of volumes of general, local and private laws and journals for sale; disposition of proceeds.

The Office of the Secretary of State shall provide for the publication of sufficient additional volumes of the general laws, local and private laws and journals not otherwise provided for by law, to be made available for sale at a reasonable cost, including preparation, printing, shipping and handling. The Office of the Secretary of State shall pay the proceeds of such sales into the State General Fund in the manner prescribed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4095; 1906, § 4647; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7485; 1930, § 6945; 1942, § 4205; Laws, 1989, ch. 321, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 430, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 17; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-5-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§1-5-13. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7498; 1930, § 6953; 1942, § 4213; Laws, 1914, ch. 204; Laws, 1948, ch. 424; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 430, § 6; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996)]

§ 1-5-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§1-5-15. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7499; 1930, § 6954; 1942, § 4214; Laws, 1914, ch. 204]

§ 1-5-17.
University law school to have books for exchange.

The dean of the law school of the University of Mississippi may make requisitions to the Secretary of State for the general session laws and journals of the Legislature to exchange with other states for similar publications and make the same available in the University of Mississippi law school library for the purpose of increasing the facilities of the library. The Secretary of State may furnish these publications upon requisition from the dean of the law school of the University of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4217; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 29; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 8; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-5-19.
Publication and distribution of journals and laws.

The Office of the Secretary of State shall provide for the publication of sufficient volumes of the House journal, Senate journal, general laws and local and private laws necessary to meet the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4219; Laws, 1936, ch. 211; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 9; Laws, 1993, ch. 430, § 7; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 19; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-5-21.
Sale of excess volumes.

The Secretary of State may sell the volumes of the House journal, Senate journal, general laws, local and private laws and the Southern Reporter–Mississippi Cases in excess of the number thereof necessary for distribution or retention, the sale price for each volume to be the cost price of printing, binding and mailing. The funds realized by the Secretary of State from the sale of those excess volumes shall be paid by him into the State General Fund in the manner prescribed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4220; Laws, 1936, ch. 211; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 10; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-5-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§1-5-23. [Codes, 1942, § 4221; Laws, 1936, ch. 211]

§ 1-5-25.
To receive certain books from the sheriffs and distribute them.

The Secretary of State shall receive from the several sheriffs all extra copies of the acts of the Legislature, which the sheriffs are required to return to him, and he shall see that the several sheriffs perform the duty required of them in this behalf. If there be less than ten copies of any of the acts, in the State Library, he shall supply the deficiency from the acts so returned to him, and out of the residue of the acts so returned, he shall, as far as can be, supply each county with the books needed to complete the set belonging to each respectively, and shall take the receipt of the sheriff therefor; and any books not thus disposed of shall be preserved in his office, and sold as other like books.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4100; 1906 § 4652; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7490; 1930, § 6950; 1942, § 4210.